Hawaii statutes.
§587A-33 Termination of parental rights
hearing. (a) At a termination of parental rights hearing, the court shall
determine whether there exists clear and convincing evidence that:

(1) A child's parent whose rights are subject to
termination is not presently willing and able to provide the parent's child
with a safe family home, even with the assistance of a service plan;

(2) It is not reasonably foreseeable that the child's
parent whose rights are subject to termination will become willing and able to
provide the child with a safe family home, even with the assistance of a
service plan, within a reasonable period of time, which shall not exceed two
years from the child's date of entry into foster care;

(3) The proposed permanent plan is in the best interests
of the child. In reaching this determination, the court shall:

(A) Presume that it is in the best interests
of the child to be promptly and permanently placed with responsible and
competent substitute parents and family in a safe and secure home; and

(B) Give greater weight to the presumption
that the permanent plan is in the child's best interest, the younger the child
is upon the child's date of entry into foster care; and

(4) The child consents to the permanent plan if the
child is at least fourteen years old, unless the court consults with the child
in camera and finds that it is in the best interest of the child to proceed
without the child's consent.

(b) If the court determines that the criteria
set forth in subsection (a) are established by clear and convincing evidence
and the goal of the permanent plan is for the child to be adopted or remain in
permanent custody, the court shall order:

(1) That the child's parent's parental rights be
terminated;

(2) Termination of the existing service plan and
revocation of the prior award of foster custody;

(3) That permanent custody of the child be awarded to
an appropriate authorized agency;

(4) An appropriate permanent plan; and

(5) The entry of any other orders the court deems to
be in the best interests of the child, including restricting or excluding
unnecessary parties from participating in adoption or other subsequent
proceedings.

(c) Unless otherwise ordered by the court or
until the child is adopted, the child's family member shall retain, to the
extent that the family member possessed the responsibility prior to the
termination of parental rights, the continuing responsibility to support the
child, including repaying the cost of any and all care, treatment, or any other
service provided by the permanent custodian, any subsequent permanent
custodian, other authorized agency, or the court for the child's benefit.

(d) A family member may be permitted
visitation with the child at the discretion of the permanent custodian. The
court may review the exercise of such discretion and may order that a family
member be permitted such visitation as is in the best interests of the child.

(e) An order for the termination of parental
rights entered under this chapter shall not operate to terminate the mutual
rights of inheritance of the child and the child's family members or any other
benefit to which the child may be entitled, until the child has been adopted.

(f) The court, in its discretion, may vest
permanent custody of a child in an authorized agency or in subsequently
authorized agencies, as the court deems to be in the best interests of the
child.

(g) If the department receives a report that
the child has been harmed or is subject to threatened harm by the acts or
omissions of the permanent custodians of the child, the department may
automatically assume either family supervision over the child and the child's
permanent custodian or foster custody of the child. The department shall
immediately notify the court, and the court shall set the case for a permanency
hearing within ten days after the department receives such a report, unless the
court deems a later date to be in the best interests of the child.

(h) If the court determines that the criteria
set forth in subsection (a) are not established by clear and convincing
evidence, the court shall order:

(1) The preparation of a plan to achieve permanency
for the child;

(2) The entry of any orders that the court deems to
be in the best interests of the child;

(3) A periodic review hearing to be held within six
months after the date of the last permanency hearing; and

(4) A permanency hearing to be held within twelve
months of the date of the last permanency hearing.

(i) Absent compelling reasons, if the child
has been in foster care under the department's responsibility for an aggregate
of fifteen out of the most recent twenty-two months from the date of entry into
foster care, the department shall file a motion to terminate parental rights. [L
2010, c 135, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 51, §7]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next